District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Eric’s ID Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 7 of the District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, approved March 3, 1925
(43 Stat. 1121; D.C. Official Code § 50-1401.01), is amended by adding a new subsection (i-1) to
read as follows:
“(i-1)(1) On any new or renewal application for a driver’s license, permit, or
identification card issued pursuant to this section, section 8a, or section 8c, the Department shall
offer an applicant the option to have their driver’s license, permit, or identification card indicate
that the applicant has a nonapparent disability through the use of an indicator or notation.
“(2)(A) For an applicant who chooses to indicate a nonapparent disability, an


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
indicator or notation shall be placed on the front of the driver’s license, permit, or identification
card.
“(B) The selection and application of the nonapparent disability indicator
or notation shall not affect an applicant’s ability to add any other disability indicators or notations
authorized by the Department by regulation to the front or back of a license, permit, or
identification card.
“(3) The Department:
“(A) Shall designate a butterfly symbol as the nonapparent disability
indicator; and
“(B) May, through rulemaking, designate other indicators or notations to
indicate a nonapparent disability.
“(4) The Department shall conduct a public outreach campaign on the availability
of a nonapparent disability indicator in consultation with the Office of Disability Rights.
“(5) The Department shall remove a nonapparent disability indicator or notation
from a driver’s license, permit, or identification card upon request.
“(6) The Department shall not:
“(A) Require proof of a nonapparent disability before approving the
nonapparent disability indicator or notation on a driver’s license, permit, or identification card;
“(B) Use information disclosed by an individual under this section as a
basis to require the individual to undergo a driver's license medical review process, unless the


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
disclosure of that information was required by District law or regulation.
“(7)(A) Within 180 days after the effective date of the Eric’s ID Amendment Act
of 2026, as approved by the Committee on Transportation and the Environment on September 16,
2026 (Committee Print of Bill 26-619), the Metropolitan Police Department (“MPD”) shall
implement training for all sworn police officers concerning interactions with individuals who
have a nonapparent disability indicator or notation on their driver’s license, permit, or
identification card.
“(B) Prior to offering the training to sworn police officers, the content of
such training shall be reviewed by the Office of Disability Rights in coordination with MPD’s
ADA coordinator.
“(8) For the purposes of this subsection, the term:
“(A) “Disability” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 2(4)
of the Disability Rights Protection Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-239; D.C.
Official Code § 2-1431.01(4)).
“(B) “Nonapparent disability” means a disability that is not immediately
obvious or visible, including developmental disabilities and intellectual disabilities.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of January 1, 2027.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).